District of Columbia statutes.
24-114

Enactment of amendments to District of Columbia Official Code.

If, within 270 days after August 5, 1997, the Council of the District of Columbia has failed to amend the District of Columbia Official Code to enact in whole the recommendations of the Commission under this chapter, or if the Commission fails to make such recommendations within the deadline established under such section, the Attorney General (after consultation with the Commission) shall promulgate within 90 days amendments to the District of Columbia Official Code with respect to the sentences to be imposed for all offenses committed on or after 3 years after August 5, 1997. Such amendments shall be consistent with the standards of subsections (a) through (d) of § 24-112. Such amendments shall take effect 30 days after the Attorney General transmits the recommendations to Congress.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11214
1981 Ed., § 24-1214.